Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4821
Physician; inquire of new patient; provide information.

Each physician may inquire of a new patient who is at least eighteen years of age and younger than forty-five years of age on the new patient's intake form as to whether the patient is registered with the bone marrow registry. If the patient states that the patient is not registered with the bone marrow registry, the physician may provide information developed and disseminated by the Department of Health and Human Services regarding the bone marrow registry to the patient.

Laws 2020, LB541, § 2.